Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7446
Wholesale medical gas distributor, defined.

Wholesale medical gas distributor means any person engaged in the wholesale drug distribution of medical gases provided to suppliers or other entities licensed or otherwise authorized to use, administer, or distribute such gases.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 20.